Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,191
Not-for-profit organization; director, officer, or trustee; immunity from civil liability.

(1) On or after August 30, 1987, any person who serves as a director, officer, or trustee of a not-for-profit organization and who is not compensated for his or her services as a director, officer, or trustee on a salary or a prorated equivalent basis shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission which results in damage or injury if such person was acting within the scope of his or her official functions and duties as a director, officer, or trustee unless such damage or injury was caused by the willful or wanton act or omission of such director, officer, or trustee.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to establish, diminish, or abrogate any duties that a director, officer, or trustee of a not-for-profit organization has to the not-for-profit organization for which the director, officer, or trustee serves.

(3) For purposes of this section, a director, officer, or trustee shall not be considered compensated solely by reason of the payment of his or her actual expenses incurred in attending meetings or in executing such office, the receipt of meals at meetings, or the receipt of gifts not exceeding a total value of one hundred dollars in any twelve consecutive months.

Laws 1987, LB 67, § 2.